Hawaii statutes.
[§487-8] Powers and duties of other
departments and agencies. Nothing contained in this chapter shall be
deemed to delegate or detract in any way from the functions, powers and duties
prescribed by law for any other department or agency of the State, nor to
interrupt or preclude the direct relationships of any such department or agency
or units of county government in the performance of such functions, powers and
duties. [L 1969, c 175, §8]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next